Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.390

Personal service of process outside state.

Personal service of any process in an action under this chapter may be made upon any person outside the state if such person has engaged in conduct in violation of this chapter which has had the impact in this state which this chapter reprehends. Such persons shall be deemed to have thereby submitted themselves to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state within the meaning of RCW 4.28.180 and 4.28.185. A holder of an out-of-state collection agency license is deemed to have appointed the director or the director's designee to be the licensee's true and lawful agent upon whom may be served any legal process against that licensee arising or growing out of any violation of this chapter.

[ 1994 c 195 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 30.]